Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Director of the Department of Consumer and Business  Services, in
consultation with the Oregon Health Authority, shall study and report on  existing barriers
to effective treatment for and  recovery from substance use disorders, including addictions
to opioids and opiates, that are a result of current structures of  payment for treatment and
recovery services in  both publicly and privately funded health systems in Oregon. The report
must including findings on:
(a) The  impact of reimbursement systems, rules and requirements established by coor-
dinated care organizations and third-party payers on access to treatment and recovery ser-
vices for substance use disorders, including access  to evidence-based treatment and
medication-assisted treatment;
(b) Existing structures for  reimbursement of substance use disorder treatment, including
the use of the least costly treatment option before any other treatment options;
(c) The classification of substance use disorder as an acute illness rather  than a chronic
illness;
(d) Access to medication-assisted treatment for substance use  disorders in rural and
underserved areas of this state; and
(e) Substance use disorder treatment options other than medication-assisted treatment.
(2) The director, in consultation  with the Department of Corrections, shall study the ease
of and barriers to access to medication-assisted treatment for individuals entering into and
leaving custody of the Department of Corrections, and shall  include findings from the study
described in this subsection in the report described in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) The  director shall submit the report described in subsection (1) of this section in the
manner provided in  ORS 192.245, and shall include recommendations for legislation, to an
interim committee of the Legislative  Assembly related to public health not later than June
30, 2018.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2018 Act is repealed on January 2, 2019.
SECTION 3. (1) The Oregon Health Authority shall establish a pilot project for the pur-
pose of  determining the effectiveness of establishing immediate access to appropriate
evidence-based treatment for persons who  suffer opioid and opiate overdoses. The pilot
project may include:
Enrolled House Bill 4143 (HB 4143-A) Page 1
(a) Creating a direct  link between an emergency department and appropriate treatment
and resources, including the availability of medication-assisted  treatment in the emergency
department;
(b) Using peer recovery support mentors to facilitate the link  between an emergency
department and appropriate treatment and resources; and
(c) Any other programming aimed at reducing deaths  caused by opioid and opiate over-
doses by providing persons  who suffer opioid and opiate overdoses with immediate access to
appropriate treatment and resources.
(2) The authority shall implement the pilot  project in Coos, Jackson, Marion and
Multnomah Counties.
(3) At least twice each year, the counties listed in subsection (2)  of this section shall
report to each other and the authority regarding the pilot project. The counties and the  au-
thority may jointly determine the form and content of the  reporting required under this
subsection.
(4) Not later than December 31 of each year, the authority shall submit, in  the manner
provided in ORS 192.245,  a report on the efficacy and implementation of the pilot project
described in this section, and  may include any recommendations for legislation, to an interim
committee of the Legislative Assembly related to public health.
(5) The authority may adopt rules to carry out this section.
SECTION 4.
There is appropriated to the  Oregon Health Authority, out of the General
Fund, the amount of $2,000,000 for the purpose of carrying out the  provisions of section 3
of this 2018 Act. This appropriation is available continuously until the  earlier of the date on
which the amount is expended for the purpose specified in this section or January 2, 2021.
SECTION 5. Section 3 of this 2018 Act is repealed on January 2, 2021.
SECTION 6. Section 7 of this 2018 Act is added to and made a part of  ORS 431A.855 to
431A.900.
SECTION 7. (1) In order to ensure the development, administration and evaluation  of
best practices for prescribing opioids and opiates, a practitioner shall register with the
electronic system established under ORS 431A.855.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority may adopt rules to administer this section.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 431A.855 is amended to read:
431A.855. (1)(a) The Oregon Health Authority, in consultation with the Prescription Monitoring
Program Advisory Commission, shall establish and maintain a prescription  monitoring program for
monitoring and reporting:
(A) Prescription drugs dispensed by pharmacies licensed by the State  Board of Pharmacy that
are classified in schedules II through IV under the federal Controlled  Substances Act, 21 U.S.C. 811
and 812, as modified by the board by rule under ORS 475.035; and
(B) Prescribed naloxone dispensed by pharmacies.
(b)(A) To fulfill  the requirements of this subsection, the authority shall establish, maintain and
operate an electronic system to monitor and report drugs described in paragraph (a) of this sub-
section that are dispensed by prescription.
(B) The electronic system must :
(i) Operate and be accessible by practitioners  and pharmacies 24 hours a day, seven days a
week; and
(ii) Allow practitioners to register  as required under section 7 of this 2018 Act and to
apply for access to the electronic system  in accordance with rules adopted by the authority
under subsection (2) of this section .
(C) The authority may contract with a state agency or private entity to ensure the effective
operation of the electronic system.
(2) In consultation with the commission, the authority shall adopt rules  for the operation of the
electronic  prescription  monitoring program established under subsection (1) of this section, including
standards for:
Enrolled House Bill 4143 (HB 4143-A) Page 2
(a) Reporting data;
(b) Providing maintenance, security and disclosure of data;
(c) Ensuring accuracy and completeness of data;
(d) Complying with the  federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (P.L.
104-191) and regulations adopted under that law, including  45 C.F.R. parts 160 and 164, federal al-
cohol and drug treatment confidentiality laws and regulations adopted under  those laws, including
42 C.F.R. part 2,  and state health and mental health confidentiality laws, including ORS 179.505,
192.517 and 192.553 to 192.581;
(e) Ensuring accurate identification of persons or entities requesting information  from the da-
tabase;
(f) Accepting printed or nonelectronic reports from pharmacies that do not  have the capability
to provide electronic reports; [ and]
(g) Notifying a patient, before or when a drug classified  in schedules II through IV is dispensed
to the patient, about the prescription monitoring program and the  entry of the prescription in the
electronic system ; and
(h) Registering practitioners with the electronic system .
(3) The authority shall submit an annual report to  the commission regarding the prescription
monitoring program established under this section.
SECTION 9.
(1) Section 3 of this 2018 Act becomes operative on January 1, 2019.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority may take  any action before the operative date specified
in subsection (1) of this section that is  necessary to enable the authority to exercise, on and
after the operative date specified  in subsection (1) of this section, all of the duties, functions
and powers conferred on the authority by section 3 of this 2018 Act.
SECTION 10. (1) A practitioner shall register  as required by section 7 of this 2018 Act
not later than July 1, 2018.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section applies to a person who:
(a) Is a practitioner on the effective date of this 2018 Act; or
(b) Becomes a practitioner before July 1, 2018.
SECTION 11.
This 2018 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2018 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled House Bill 4143 (HB 4143-A) Page 3
Passed by House March 1, 2018
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 2, 2018
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2018
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2018
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2018
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4143 (HB 4143-A) Page 4